Hawaii statutes.
§76-51 Prohibited activities by members of
a merit appeals board. No person who occupies any elective or appointive
office under the state or county government shall be eligible for membership on
or continue to be a member of the merit appeals board. The term
"appointive office" for the purpose of this section, shall not
include notaries public. No member of the merit appeals board shall, during
the member's term of office, serve as an officer or committee member of any
political party organization, including a precinct organization, or present
oneself as a candidate or be a candidate for nomination or election to any
public office at any election. The office of any member who violates this
section or section 84-13 or 84-14 shall be conclusively presumed to have been
abandoned and vacated by reason thereof and the chief executive shall thereupon
appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. As an alternative remedy,
proceedings in the nature of quo warranto may be brought by any person to oust
any member who violates this section or section 84-13 or 84-14. [L 1955, c 274,
pt of §1; RL 1955, §3-16; HRS §76-51; gen ch 1985; am L 2000, c 253, §31]

Attorney General Opinions

Employee of department of education may not be a member of a
civil service commission. Att. Gen. Op. 90-9.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next